Idaho, session 2025, H0271.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 90, Title 18, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 90
ADVERTISING ILLEGAL DRUGS
18-9001. ADVERTISING ILLEGAL DRUGS PROHIBITED. (1) Any person who
willfully publishes any commercial advertisement, in any medium, within the
state of Idaho for marijuana, narcotics, or other psychoactive substances
that are illegal under Idaho Code and illegal under the laws of the juris-
diction where the marijuana, narcotics, or other psychoactive substances
are provided, including federal, state, or local laws, is guilty of a mis-
demeanor, punishable in accordance with section 18-113, Idaho Code, with a
fine of five hundred dollars ($500) to be imposed for each violation. Each
day in which a violation of this section exists shall be considered a sepa-
rate offense.
(2) As used in this section, "commercial advertisement" means an ad-
vertisement that encourages consumers to engage with products or services to
benefit a commercial enterprise.
SECTION 2. That Section 19-4705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-4705. PAYMENT OF FINES AND FORFEITURES -- SATISFACTION OF JUDGMENT
-- DISPOSITION -- APPORTIONMENT. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsec-
tion (2) of this section:
(a) All fines and forfeitures collected pursuant to the judgment of
any court of the state shall be remitted to the court in which the judg-
ment was rendered. The judgment shall then be satisfied by entry in the
docket of the court. The clerk of the court shall daily remit all fines
and forfeitures to the county auditor, who shall at the end of each month
apportion the proceeds according to the provisions of this chapter.
Other existing laws regarding the disposition of fines and forfeitures
are hereby repealed to the extent such laws are inconsistent with the
provisions of this chapter, except as provided in section 49-1013(5),
Idaho Code.


(b) Fines and forfeitures remitted for violations of fish and game
laws shall be apportioned two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) to the
state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, ten percent
(10%) to the search and rescue account, twenty-two and one-half percent
(22 1/2%) to the district court fund, and sixty-five percent (65%) to
the public shooting range fund as provided in section 36-418, Idaho
Code.
(c) Fines and forfeitures remitted for violations of state motor ve-
hicle laws, for violation of state driving privilege laws, and for
violation of state laws prohibiting driving while under the influence
of alcohol, drugs or any other intoxicating substances shall be appor-
tioned ten percent (10%) to the state treasurer, of which eighty-six
percent (86%) shall be deposited to the state general fund and fourteen
percent (14%) shall be deposited to the peace officers standards and
training fund authorized in section 19-5116, Idaho Code, forty-five
percent (45%) to the state treasurer for deposit in the highway distri-
bution account, twenty-two and one-half percent (22 1/2%) to the dis-
trict court fund, and twenty-two and one-half percent (22 1/2%) to the
state treasurer for deposit in the public school income fund; provided,
however, that fines and forfeitures remitted for violation of state mo-
tor vehicle laws, for violation of state driving privilege laws, and for
violation of state laws prohibiting driving while under the influence
of alcohol, drugs or any other intoxicating substances, where an arrest
is made or a citation is issued by a city law enforcement official or by
a law enforcement official of a governmental agency under contract to
provide law enforcement services for a city, shall be apportioned ten
percent (10%) to the state treasurer, of which eighty-six percent (86%)
shall be deposited to the state general fund and fourteen percent (14%)
shall be deposited to the peace officers standards and training fund
authorized in section 19-5116, Idaho Code, and ninety percent (90%) to
the city whose officer made the arrest or issued the citation.
(d) Fines and forfeitures remitted for violation of any state law not
involving fish and game laws, motor vehicle laws, state driving privi-
lege laws, or state laws prohibiting driving while under the influence
of alcohol, drugs or any other intoxicating substances shall be appor-
tioned ten percent (10%) to the state treasurer, of which eighty-six
percent (86%) shall be deposited to the state general fund and fourteen
percent (14%) shall be deposited to the peace officers standards and
training fund authorized in section 19-5116, Idaho Code, and ninety
percent (90%) to the district court fund of the county in which the vio-
lation occurred.
(e) Fines and forfeitures remitted for violation of county ordinances
shall be apportioned ten percent (10%) to the state treasurer, of which
eighty-six percent (86%) shall be deposited to the state general fund
and fourteen percent (14%) shall be deposited to the peace officers
standards and training fund authorized in section 19-5116, Idaho Code,
and ninety percent (90%) to the district court fund of the county whose
ordinance was violated.
(f) Fines and forfeitures remitted for violation of city ordinances
shall be apportioned ten percent (10%) to the state treasurer, of which


eighty-six percent (86%) shall be deposited to the state general fund
and fourteen percent (14%) shall be deposited to the peace officers
standards and training fund authorized in section 19-5116, Idaho Code,
and ninety percent (90%) to the city whose ordinance was violated.
(g) Fines and forfeitures remitted for violations not specified in this
chapter shall be apportioned ten percent (10%) to the state treasurer,
of which eighty-six percent (86%) shall be deposited to the state gen-
eral fund and fourteen percent (14%) shall be deposited to the peace of-
ficers standards and training fund authorized in section 19-5116, Idaho
Code, and ninety percent (90%) to the district court fund of the county
in which the violation occurred, except in cases where a duly designated
officer of any city police department or city law enforcement official
made the arrest for any such violation, in which case ninety percent
(90%) shall be apportioned to the city whose officer made the arrest.
(h) Fines and forfeitures remitted for violations involving any of the
provisions of chapter 71, title 67, Idaho Code, shall be apportioned ten
percent (10%) to the state treasurer, of which eighty-six percent (86%)
shall be deposited to the state general fund and fourteen percent (14%)
shall be deposited to the peace officers standards and training fund au-
thorized in section 19-5116, Idaho Code, and ninety percent (90%) to the
general fund of the county or city whose law enforcement official issued
the citation.
(i) Fines and forfeitures remitted for violations of overweight laws
as provided in section 49-1013(3), Idaho Code, shall be deposited one
hundred percent (100%) into the highway distribution account.
(j) Fines remitted for violations of section 18-7008, Idaho Code, shall
be apportioned ten percent (10%) to the district court fund, sixty-five
percent (65%) to the county where the trespass occurred for appropria-
tion to the sheriff's office, and twenty-five percent (25%) to the Idaho
rangeland resources commission for expanded education programs regard-
ing private property rights and land user responsibility.
(k) Fines remitted for violations of section 18-9001, Idaho Code, shall
be apportioned ninety percent (90%) to the county where the violation
occurred for appropriation to the sheriff's office and ten percent
(10%) to the district court fund of the county where the violation oc-
curred.
(2) Any fine or forfeiture remitted for any misdemeanor violation for
which an increase in the maximum fine became effective on or after July 1,
2005, shall be apportioned as follows:
(a) Any funds remitted, up to the maximum amount that could have been
imposed before July 1, 2005, as a fine for the misdemeanor violation
shall be apportioned according to the applicable provisions of subsec-
tion (1) of this section; and
(b) Any other funds remitted, in excess of the maximum amount that could
have been imposed before July 1, 2005, as a fine for the misdemeanor vi-
olation shall be remitted to the state treasurer and shall be deposited
in the drug court, mental health court and family court services fund as
set forth in section 1-1625, Idaho Code.
(3) As used in this section, the term "city law enforcement official"
shall include an official of any governmental agency providing law enforce-


ment services to a city in accordance with the terms of a contract or agree-
ment, when such official makes the arrest or issues a citation within the ge-
ographical limits of the city and when the contract or agreement provides for
payment to the city of fines and forfeitures resulting from such service.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.